District of Columbia statutes.
31-3603

Long-term insurance; who may issue.

Long-term care insurance may be issued by insurers, fraternal benefits societies, nonprofit health, hospital, and medical service corporations, prepaid health plans, and health maintenance organizations, and any similar organization to the extent they are otherwise authorized to issue life or health insurance. Any product advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care insurance shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 4, 47 DCR 2038